Utah statutes.
17-30-5.   Organization of commission -- Secretary -- Offices -- Job
classification plan.
Each merit system commission shall be organized by its members who shall
select one member as chairman and shall have assigned to it by the county
legislative body, a qualified employee of the county to act as secretary. Such
employee shall be acceptable to the commission and shall act and serve as
secretary without additional compensation unless the county legislative body
so specifies. The county legislative body shall provide suitable
accommodations, supplies and equipment as needed to enable the commission to
attend to its business. The commission shall formulate a comprehensive job
classification plan covering all peace officers of the governmental unit. The
plan shall place all positions requiring substantially the same duties and
qualifications in the same classification and shall include minimum physical
and educational qualifications of the applicants for each position, and
provide standards for promotion. The commission shall adopt a classification
plan which shall be the basis of the administration of this act until changed
with the approval of the commission. In the event a new position is created
and approved by the governing body, such position shall automatically be
classified and become a part of the classification plan.
